Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-307
State colleges; president; collection of fees.

The president of each state college shall receive and collect fees for board and room and such other fees as may be payable to such state college and shall disburse the same under direction of the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges and according to law.

Laws 1937, c. 212, § 3, p. 850;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 85-320;

R.S.1943, § 85-307;

Laws 1967, c. 36, § 9, p. 165;

Laws 1969, c. 852, § 6, p. 3201;

Laws 2022, LB887, § 7.